


About the team Finding your dream home is only the first step in the home-buying process. On the Zillow Mortgages team, we are building products to help educate and empower people through the process of financing their home. Do you want to make a huge impact on lots of real users' lives while working on a small, fast-moving, technology-forward team? If you answered yes, this is the role for you.
  
 About the role
 As a Senior Software Development Engineer, you’ll lead the delivery and ongoing support of projects from end-to-end. In addition, you will:

 Contribute to the design of new features.
 Review the code of your peers
 Advocate for standard methodologies
 Facilitate engineering discussions
 Mentor junior engineers
 Participate in an inclusive, energetic and highly multi-functional team.

 This role has been categorized as a Remote position. “Remote” employees do not have a permanent corporate office workplace and, instead, work from a physical location of their choice which must be identified to the Company. Employees may live in any of the 50 US States, with limited exceptions. In certain cases, an employee in a remote-designated job may need to live in a specific region or time zone to support customers or clients as part of their role.
   In Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada and New York City the standard base pay range for this role is $144,000.00 - $230,000.00 Annually. This base pay range is specific to Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada and New York City and may not be applicable to other locations.
  
 Who you are
 Wondering if we're the right team for you? You'll excel in this team if you thrive on autonomy, seek out persistent problems, implement effective solutions quickly, and you are:

 A Software Development Engineer with 5+ years of experience with modern development technologies like ES6, React, Typescript that are used to deliver front-end user interfaces.
 Recognized as a technical leader on your team for several years and have an impact beyond your team.
 Passionate about setting standard methodologies and raising the bar for testing, code quality, and maintainability - not only for the team but for the entire engineering organization.
 Ready to improve your skills, solve complex engineering problems, and advance your career!
 Here at Zillow - we value the experience and perspective of candidates with non-traditional backgrounds. We encourage you to apply if you have transferable skills or related experiences.

 In addition to a competitive base salary this position is also eligible for equity awards based on factors such as experience, performance and location.
  
 Get to know us
 Zillow is reimagining real estate to make it easier to unlock life’s next chapter.

 As the most-visited real estate website in the United States, Zillow® and its affiliates help movers find and win their home through digital solutions, first class partners, and easier buying, selling, financing and renting experiences. Millions of people visit Zillow Group sites every month to start their home search, and now they can rely on Zillow to help make it easier to move. The work we do is helping people move from dreaming to transacting — and no matter what job you're in, you will play a critical role in making this vision a reality.
 Our efforts to streamline the real estate transaction are supported by a deep-rooted culture of innovation, our passion to redefine the employee experience, a fundamental commitment to Equity and Belonging, and world-class benefits. We’re also setting the standard for work experiences of the future, where our employees are supported in doing their best work and living a flexible, well-balanced life. But don’t just take our word for it. Read recent reviews on Glassdoor and recent recognition from multiple organizations, including: the 100 Best Companies to Work For in 2022 list, Glassdoor Employees’ Choice Award, honoring the Best Places to Work in 2022, Bloomberg Gender-Equality Index 2022, Human Rights Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equity Index and Best Place to Work for LGBTQ Equality 2022, and TIME 100 Most Influential Companies list. 

Zillow Group is an equal opportunity employer committed to fostering an inclusive, innovative environment with the best employees. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please contact us at RecruitingAccessibility@zillowgroup.com.

 Applicants who receive job offers from Zillow Group will be asked to sign a Proprietary Rights Agreement which includes confidentiality, intellectual property assignment, customer and employee non-solicitation, and non-competition provisions. If you are contacted for a role at Zillow Group and wish to review a copy of the Proprietary Rights Agreement prior to receiving an offer, you may request a copy from your Recruiter.

 See what information we collect about you.



Requisition ID: R10044404

Category: Engineering 
Location: San Diego, California, United States of America 
Citizenship Required: United States Citizenship 
Clearance Type: Secret 
Telecommute: Yes-May consider hybrid teleworking for this position 
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America) 
Travel Required: Yes, 10% of the Time 
Positions Available: 2 



   At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
    Northrop Grumman Aeronautics Systems is looking for an Associate Engineer or Engineer Software to support the organization in San Diego, CA.
 Roles and Responsibilities Include:

 Design, develop, debug, and document a test automation framework that supports verification of real time embedded software on the Vehicle Management System.
 Develop and conduct formal requirements based testing using manual and automated test procedures
 Analyze discrepancies in software, requirements, and test procedures and use analytical skills to report and resolve issues.
 Troubleshoot and modify test tools and test scripts.
 Work with the lead test engineer and peers, as well as a team of systems engineers and software developers to establish and develop test methods and techniques.
 Technical customer liaison for test procedure walkthroughs during peer reviews and answering questions related to formal qualification test results and analyses.

 ***This requisition may be filled at either an Associate Engineer Software level or Engineer Software level ***
 Basic Qualifications Associate Engineer Software:

 Bachelor of Science (BS) in a Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) discipline with 0+ years Software Engineering experience
 Experience in C and C++ Object-Oriented Design and Development
 Experience with Python
 Must have US Citizenship
 Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance and SAP (Special Access Programs)
 Must have reliable means to get to work on time every workday - taxis or ridesharing services not permitted

 Basic Qualifications Engineer Software:

 Bachelors in a STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) discipline with 2 years engineering related experience, OR Master’s in STEM with 0 years of Software Engineering experience.
 Experience in C and C++ Object-Oriented Design and Development
 Experience with Python
 Must have US Citizenship
 Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance and SAP (Special Access Programs)
 Must have reliable means to get to work on time every workday - taxis or ridesharing services not permitted

 Preferred Qualifications:

 Excellent communication and organizational skills
 Strong interpersonal and analytic skills
 Proficiency in C#, C/C++, and Python
 Familiarity with XML and XML schemas
 Experience developing User Interfaces using WPF and XAML
 Familiarity with Model–view–viewmodel (MVVM) software architectural pattern
 Preferred knowledge of an agile software development environment using agile engineering applications such as Jira, Confluence, Bitbucket, & Crucible.
 Active Secret Clearance.





Salary Range: $68,100 USD - $102,100 USD
  

Salary Range 2: $82,400 USD - $123,600 USD
  



   Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
   



The health and safety of our employees and their families is a top priority. The company encourages employees to remain up-to-date on their COVID-19 vaccinations. U.S. Northrop Grumman employees may be required, in the future, to be vaccinated or have an approved disability/medical or religious accommodation, pursuant to future court decisions and/or government action on the currently stayed federal contractor vaccine mandate under Executive Order 14042 https://www.saferfederalworkforce.gov/contractors/.
 Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit http://www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.



Disney Streaming Media Engineering builds the software and systems that prepare media content and metadata for the Disney Streaming platform - providing the best possible playback experience to our viewers.
Media Engineering handles audio, video, and metadata content from ingest through publish - for normalization, processing, and packaging - supporting operator tools and automation for a scalable workflow. We build logic across players and back-end services to measure, control, and optimize playback across our stack.
The Content Management Platform team is seeking a talented Software Engineer II with the drive to advance the technology backbone of Media Engineering. Our team is responsible for acquisition, management and distribution of content from over 1500 partners. We deliver the highest quality video to over a hundred million viewers, and we need your help to expand our systems and create new experiences. As part of this team, you will be responsible for the management of all descriptive metadata on the Content Management Platform. You will use AWS, Docker, Spinnaker, Kubernetes, frameworks such as Spring Boot and Django, and best practices in software engineering.
Responsibilities :

Design well-architected solutions and build iteratively into systems while maintaining the best agile practices
Understand and implement the best engineering practices to write well-constructed and easy to maintain code and write defensive and robust tests
Improve the content ingestion and management system APIs, publishing tools, and workflows; implement scalable and robust data engineering pipelines
Communicate status with peers and/or managers and present views and opinions respectfully. Collaborate to tackle problems in innovative and efficient new ways

Basic Qualifications :

Minimum 2 years of software development experience and proficiency in Java, Python, or similar
Expertise with core Computer Science fundamentals, including Object-Oriented programming, data structures and algorithms
Experience building systems in the Cloud (AWS)
Fundamental understanding of SQL and NoSQL databases including ACID and CAP, horizontally distributed computing, eventual consistency, messaging queues, and search indexes.
An enjoyment for going deep on performance tuning and a love of owning a problem end-to-end
A desire to relentlessly dive into problems and improve systems

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with the Spring Boot Framework
Experience designing and building large scale distributed systems with operational observability
Experience using continuous integration and deployment with regression, load and stress testing
Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing and Deep Learning experience (Keras, Tensorflow)

Required Education :

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science (or related field) or equivalent work experience

Additional Information :

Location: Santa Monica, CA (preferred) or Remote

#DISNEYTECH
 The Mom Project is excited to partner with Amazon Prime to support their DE&I initiatives and the support those looking to return to the workforce. To qualify, candidates must be out of the paid workforce or underemployed for minimally a 12-month period. 
 Are you ready to restart your career and build the future? The Amazon Returnship Program offers you an opportunity to reboot your skills, refresh your resume with new experience, and relaunch your journey toward your professional goals in a supportive, real-world environment. 
 This is a 16-week, paid and benefit-eligible, virtual employment opportunity. The successful candidate will meet all of the basic qualifications of this position and can reside anywhere within the United States. Upon successful completion of the returnship, candidates may receive, but are not guaranteed, an offer for full-time employment. In addition to successfully completing the returnship requirements, offers for full-time employment are contingent upon business need and the candidate’s advance commitment to relocate, if necessary, to a within commuting distance of the assigned work location office. Relocation assistance is provided for full-time employment opportunities. 
 Come build the future as a Software Development Engineer (SDE) at Amazon, where you will be inspired working alongside best-in-class inventors and innovators. You’ll create meaningful experiences that deliver on the ever-evolving needs of our customers, and your work will impact millions of people around the world. As an Amazon software engineer, you will solve unique and complex problems at a rapid pace, utilizing the latest technologies to create solutions that are highly scalable. 
 QUALIFICATIONS & ELIGIBILITY 
 2+ years of non-internship professional software development experience 
 Programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented designExperience in both automation and manual testing 
 1+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems. 
 Must be unemployed or underemployed for 1+ years 
 Upon successful completion of the Returnship Program, candidates may receive, but are not guaranteed, an offer for full-time employment. Offers for full-time employment are contingent upon business need and the candidate’s advance commitment to relocate, if necessary, to within commuting distance of the assigned office location (New York, NY; Arlington, VA; Austin, TX; Boulder, CO; Nashville, TN; Santa Monica, CA; Seattle, WA). Relocation assistance is provided for full-time employment opportunities.Returnship candidates should not currently be enrolled full-time in an undergraduate or graduate degree program.

We are looking for a Senior Backend Software Engineer to join our team! Our company is a subsidiary of the Digital Currency Group, and we’re working toward a common goal of empowering a decentralized infrastructure. Our team is passionate about the future of finance and is looking for other like-minded individuals who share in this vision. While we are inclusive and diverse in workforce and style, we all agree that digital assets will change the world.
Responsibilities

Develop and maintain the infrastructure of the mining and staking operations. This includes:
API server
Back-end software for managing Bitcoin wallet and automating transactions. This software interfaces with Bitcoin Core full nodes through the RPC protocol.
Ensure strong system security to protect funds in Bitcoin wallet.
Make sure payment and statistics servers are coded correctly and operating properly.
Ubuntu Linux system administration for servers running in Amazon AWS or colocation datacenter.
Write documentation on how to maintain and troubleshoot the system.
Remain in an on-call rotation with other engineers in the team to troubleshoot critical downtime.
Work closely with product owners, project managers, other development teams, DevOps and infrastructure teams.

About You:

5+ years professional experience in software engineering, software architecture, focused on backend development.
Bachelor's Degree preferred
Passionate about technology and interested in Bitcoin, blockchain, and tech entrepreneurship
Strong understanding of web services, API, databases, I18N, Kafka, and data analysis & reporting
Interest in researching topics related to digital assets, mining, and staking
Have a working knowledge of databases and monitoring and alerting systems
Self-starter, strong problem-solving skills, and ability to meet tight deadlines
Comfortable working in agile and lean project environments
Working knowledge of Bitcoin mining and/or interest to learn development
Preferred Qualifications; Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Technical skills

Very strong Java programming skills (5+ years recent professional experience). Kotlin skills a big plus.
Ubuntu Linux system administration
REST/HTTP, JSON/XML, RPC
Database Operations (SQL, NoSQL, Redis)
Cloud servers such as Amazon AWS and Digital Ocean
Experience in operating mining, staking, or running validating node efforts
Microservices architecture
Git version control

What we offer:

The chance to work in a fast-paced start-up environment with experienced industry leaders
A learning environment where you can dive deep into the latest technologies and make an impact
Competitive salary and benefits
Flexible vacation policy - work with your manager to take time off when you need it

Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $150,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year
Benefits:

401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance

Schedule:

8 hour shift
Monday to Friday

Supplemental Pay:

Bonus pay

Work Location: Remote



Programming experience with at least one software programming language.
 1+ years of experience in software development
 Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or similar technical field
 4+ years of experience as a Software Development Engineer
 Experience developing automation in at least one of OO languages - Java, C#/C++, Python
 Experience in framework design and development


 Job summary Our team Our team and technology are responsible for creating hiring solutions for millions of applicants and future Amazonians that will help Amazon stay customer obsessed. We create global solutions that not only scale up in volume, but also handle the complexity of diverse workflows and country specific rules/regulations. Our team is growing rapidly at multiple locations. If you have the drive, tenacity, an entrepreneurial spirit, and most importantly the day 1 spark to take on ambiguous problems head on, in a fast-paced environment, this is the place for you! The role As part of our growth and expansion, we are setting up brand new teams to build end-to-end hiring solutions on Native AWS from ground up. This solution will handle all phases of hiring process from job creation, search, and application to all the way candidate day 1 experience. As a Software Development Engineer, you will drive the development of services and assets for an external facing, mobile first, global solution that will be used by millions of applicants aspiring to work at Amazon. You will own automation of business processes using proven as well as evolving AWS services and other technologies to create a friction free customer experience. Your tier-one services will have highest standards and be available 24x7, scale under massive load, and perform consistently. We want you if - · You strive to build highly available, scalable, and performant tier-one services to power responsive, intuitive, and sleek experiences for customers. · You have high standards and drive a culture of excellence, grow and mature a young team to take them to the next level. · You are an excellent communicator, both verbal and written, and equally adept at communicating upwards and downwards. · You are curious, love problem-solving, diving deep, collect data to make well informed decisions, but use sound judgement in the face of insufficient data. · You follow the latest technologies and motivate your teams to innovate. · You have strong leadership qualities, and a track record of delivering great solutions. Key job responsibilities In this role you will - · Be a technical leader that is not afraid to challenge the norms and innovate. · Execute against project plans and delivery commitments. · Develop relationships with internal and external partner teams to move fast. · Help establish the long-term success strategy for your systems, development best practices, and operational excellence processes. · Collaborate with peers to ensure your strategies are in alignment with the rest of the development teams. · Develop junior and new team members by mentoring them on multiple fronts. A day in the life Attending daily stand-ups Writing tests and code Reviewing teammates' code and giving feedback Taking action on teammates feedback on you own code Meeting with stakeholders on stories Reviewing runtime metrics to monitor the system Identifying opportunities for team or system improvement Writing and updating documentation Periodic team meetings to give input on team strategy and planning About the team We are a team of 8-10 engineers who work together to design and deliver a system that enables candidates who wants to work for Amazon find a job. We are very focused on ensuring that we enable a great candidate experience. Our customers are the candidates themselves who we help through the hiring process. We also work directly with the internal workforce staffing team, data scientists, and other hiring systems to ensure a great candidate experience. We find new ways to use automation to help the hiring process move faster, smoother, and smarter. 
 


MS in Computer Science or equivalent industry experience
 Deep knowledge of object-oriented design, distributed system architecture, and various AWS technologies.
 Experience of successfully mentoring junior SDEs.
 High attention to detail and proven ability to manage multiple, competing priorities simultaneously.
 Ability to work in a fast-paced environment where continuous innovation is desired.
 History of teamwork and willingness to roll up one’s sleeves to get the job done.
 Experience architecting large-scale multi-tier web applications.

 The pay range for this position in Colorado is $110K - $160k/yr however, base pay offered may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign-on bonus and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the position offered. This information is provided per the Colorado Equal Pay Act. Base pay information is based on market location. Applicants should apply via Amazon's internal or external careers site.
  
 Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.
 



Piper Companies is seeking a Web Software Engineer for a research-based organization based in North Carolina. The Web Software Engineer will be expected to work in a REMOTE environment. This position requires a person who has experience in all parts of application development. That is, designing, developing, deploying, scaling, and maintaining them. 


Responsibilities for the Web Software Engineer include:


 Develop new open-source solutions for efficient use by internal and external users.
 Maintain and improve the performance of existing software.
 Work with users on an as-needed basis to explain new functionality
 Understand and implement best practices around developing and deploying applications in a variety of environments. 
 Use novel cloud architecture in both public and on-premises servers.


 Requirements for the Web Software Engineer:


 Bachelor’s Degree – Must have! (Preferably in Computer Science or Computer Engineering)
 2-3+ years of professional web architecture or software development experience
 Experience with JavaScript, HTML, and CSS
 Expertise in JavaScript application development, including asynchronous programming, and a strong knowledge of the server-side JavaScript ecosystem (Node.js).
 Familiarity (possibly of varying degrees) in technologies related to modern frontend frameworks & libraries, accessibility, version control systems, asynchronous programming, server-side programming, testing, building, and communicating with APIs.
 Experience with AWS and containerization is a plus but not expected.


 Compensation of the Web Software Engineer: $50,000-$70,000 Based on experience + Cigna Healthcare Benefits.
 
Work Authorization of Web Software Engineer: US Citizenship required.
 NO relocation will be offered for this role.


Data Systems Software Engineer
About Danger Devices
Danger Devices Inc. is a growing, fabless semiconductor start-up headquartered in San Jose,California. We aim to deliver best-in-class products to our customers with industry-leading design cycle times. We do that with our revolutionary, modernized approach focusing on software to increase productivity in all areas from integrated circuit design all the way to testing and data analysis.
Contribute to our industry leading team of circuit experts and software specialists. We are actively looking for software engineers to strengthen our team.
Logistics
Location(s):

Greensboro, NC
Remote (NC, CA, WA, other states negotiable)

Reports To:

Data Systems team lead

Types available:

Full-time
Internship (paid)

What you'll do at Danger Devices: 
Using skills and experience with software development and data analysis you will help to build an automated workflow of data from RFIC testdata to compliance reports, charts, and other means of analysis.
You will accomplish this through the following responsibilities:

Maintaining, supporting, and improving upon internal EDA plotting software tools
Automating the generation of product validation reports
Developing creative solutions for data analysis
Improving efficiencies from test data collection through analysis
Automating everything as possible, including DevOps activities, test data flow, etc
Working across several other teams and departments to improve data quality and flow
Jumping in and solving problems at various levels of product development
Other duties as deemed necessary by leadership

The skillset you'll bring to Danger Devices: 
A core value of the company is innovation - and we firmly believe that innovation can only occur when we're all willing to learn. You are an avid and curious learner with:

Software competence with Python, SQL, shell scripting and other languages/tools
Familiarity with data analysis methodologies
Excellent critical thinking skills
Preferred:
BS/MS in Computer Science, related discipline from accredited College or

University, or sufficient experience

Experience using Google BigQuery or other data warehousing solutions

Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract, Temporary, Internship
Pay: $60,000.00 - $145,204.00 per year
Benefits:

401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance

Schedule:

8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday

Supplemental Pay:

Bonus pay
Signing bonus

Application Question(s):

Are you interested in full-time or part-time/internship?

Experience:

Python: 1 year (Preferred)
data engineering/analysis: 1 year (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote

Our client's consumer team is looking for a skilled Senior JavaScript Engineer who can help drive the efficiency with which we deliver and evolve our industry leading products. The frontend team is focused on building out cutting edge architecture which is optimized for performance and used by millions daily. Come help us solve hard problems and make the user experience the best in the industry!
What You'll Do:

Work in a fast-paced environment that allows you to push to production daily
Make continuous improvements to site performance and UX
Add new features to enhance overall UI
Be deeply engaged in the full development lifecycle: design, code, test, deploy
Have a say in architectural design decisions and technology selection
Collaborate with your colleagues in a fun, easy-going atmosphere

Who You Are:

3+ years of experience, ideally in fast paced environments;
Deep understanding of modern javascript design patterns
Experience with ReactJS or similar.
Passionate about performant, extensible code
Self-led, capable of working with little direction
Skilled communicator with a collaborative spirit

Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $85.00 - $140.00 per hour
Schedule:

8 hour shift

Application Question(s):

This role is not open to c2c. Are you able to work W2?

Experience:

Front-end development: 3 years (Required)
JavaScript: 3 years (Required)
ReactJS: 3 years (Required)
HTML: 3 years (Required)
CSS: 3 years (Required)
scale and performance optimization: 3 years (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote

Company Description  Since we first opened our doors in 2009, the world of commerce has evolved immensely – and so has Square. After enabling anyone to take a payment and never miss a sale, we saw sellers stymied by disparate, outmoded products and tools that wouldn’t work together. So we expanded into software and started building integrated, omnichannel solutions – to help sellers sell online, manage inventory, run a busy kitchen, book appointments, engage loyal buyers, and hire and pay staff. And across it all, we’ve embedded financial services tools at the point of sale, so merchants can access a business loan and manage their cash flow all in one place.  Today, we’re a partner to sellers of all sizes – large, enterprise-scale businesses with complex commerce operations, sellers just starting out, as well as merchants who began selling with Square and have grown larger over time. As our sellers scale, so do our solutions. We all grow together.   There is a massive opportunity in front of us. We’re building a business that is big, meaningful, and lasting. And we are helping sellers around the world do the same.


  Job Description
   Merchants hire the Help Experience Team to provide them the right solutions at the right time to ensure they continue to be successful with their business.
 As a software engineer on this team, you'll be a part of evolving our support products for Square's millions of merchants. We leverage experimentation, personalization, recommendation relevancy, and more to ensure that we route sellers to the right help experiences at the right time according to their unique needs. We must do this with technical sustainability and scale in mind for our merchants and teams at Square to benefit from our work.



  Qualifications
   You will...

 Be exposed to and impact real business challenges.
 Identify and explore ways to improve application architecture, testing, and building pipeline.
 Continually seek to optimize and improve the seller experience.
 Iterate rapidly on features, tooling, and processes.
 Provide technical leadership, mentor and coach junior engineers.

 You’ll need to…

 Be proficient in building web apps and large-scale applications.
 Build with modern front-end and server-side technologies and frameworks
 Develop product infrastructure and web services.
 Work in a collaborative environment and partner with other cross-disciplinary teams to achieve optimal results.
 Embrace proactive and respectful communications in an inclusive environment.

 Technologies we use and teach...

 Ruby on Rails, JavaScript, React, TypeScript
 MySQL, Redis, Elasticsearch, PostgreSQL, Memcached

 Additional Information
  
 We’re working to build a more inclusive economy where our customers have equal access to opportunity, and we strive to live by these same values in building our workplace. Block is a proud equal opportunity employer. We work hard to evaluate all employees and job applicants consistently, without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, citizenship, or any other legally protected class.
 We believe in being fair, and are committed to an inclusive interview experience, including providing reasonable accommodations to disabled applicants throughout the recruitment process. We encourage applicants to share any needed accommodations with their recruiter, who will treat these requests as confidentially as possible. Want to learn more about what we’re doing to build a workplace that is fair and square? Check out our I+D page.
 Additionally, we consider qualified applicants with criminal histories for employment on our team, assessing candidates in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.
 Perks
 We want you to be well and thrive. Our global benefits package includes:

 Healthcare coverage
 Retirement Plans
 Employee Stock Purchase Program
 Wellness perks
 Paid parental leave
 Paid time off
 Learning and Development resources

 Block, Inc. (NYSE: SQ) is a global technology company with a focus on financial services. Made up of Square, Cash App, Spiral, TIDAL, and TBD, we build tools to help more people access the economy. Square helps sellers run and grow their businesses with its integrated ecosystem of commerce solutions, business software, and banking services. With Cash App, anyone can easily send, spend, or invest their money in stocks or Bitcoin. Spiral (formerly Square Crypto) builds and funds free, open-source Bitcoin projects. Artists use TIDAL to help them succeed as entrepreneurs and connect more deeply with fans. TBD is building an open developer platform to make it easier to access Bitcoin and other blockchain technologies without having to go through an institution.


Our client's consumer Team is looking for a Software Engineer to help their users find the product they’re looking for as efficiently as possible. See solutions impact millions of global users daily as you seek challenges such as:

Improve search experience and performance for millions of users across millions of products globally
Make the shopping experience enjoyable and more transparent
Help users discover the right product for them
Enable new ways of buying products, such as buying online and having your product delivered
Build out platforms to enable us to iterate faster and respond to our consumers quicker

What You'll Do:

Work in a multi-functional team with data analysts, product managers, and of course other engineers.
Participate in whiteboard sessions and design conversations on engineering the best solution to the challenges at hand.
Test out new ideas with novel and quick experiments.
Write clean, well-tested, and efficient code.
Iterate rapidly and deploy changes daily.
Collaborate with and be mentored by highly skilled engineers.
Have fun!

Who You Are:

2+ years of software development experience
Expertise with Java or similar object-oriented languages
Solid understanding of MySQL or similar relational database
Some experience with building scalable websites (e-commerce) or large-scale applications preferred
Drawn to and thrive in a fast-paced environment that pushes code daily
Able to work independently, as well as in a team environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills

Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $85.00 - $140.00 per hour
Schedule:

8 hour shift

Application Question(s):

This role is not open to c2c. Are you able to work W2?

Experience:

Java: 3 years (Required)
Scale: 3 years (Required)
Web development: 3 years (Required)
performance optimization: 3 years (Preferred)
MySQL: 3 years (Preferred)
building scalable websites (e-commerce environment): 3 years (Preferred)
building large-scale applications: 3 years (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote

Software Engineer/Programmer Software Engineer/Programmer Position
Overview: 
X-ScaleSolutions is a start-up based in Columbus, Ohio. We specialize in a range of high-performance and scalable solutions for current generation systems ranging from small deployments of a couple systems to multi-petaflop systems and the emerging Exascale systems. The mission of the company is to develop innovative and leading-edge software products, with a focus on four areas: 1) High-Performance Computing, 2) Deep/Machine Learning, 3) Big Data, and 4) Cloud Computing.
Are you interested in working on state-of-the-art hardware, software and middleware?
X-ScaleSolutions is looking for an enthusiastic Software Engineer/Programmer with desired experience in High-Performance Computing (HPC), Message Passing Interface (MPI), Deep Learning (TensorFlow, PyTorch, Horovod) and network programming with modern HPC interconnects (InfiniBand, Omni-path, 10-100GigE/iWARP and RoCE) and accelerators (GPUs) to join our team.
The software engineer/programmer is expected to work in a project team, take a lead role to design and develop major functional units, and perform continuous unit level and system level debugging and testing for commercial products with novel features. This position will maintain technical documents, bug-tracking systems, and manuals.
Technical expertise required: 

Strong experience in Linux
C programming
Network programming, such as TCP/IP and low-level networking stacks
Experience on HPC technologies and platforms

The ideal candidate will have: 

Knowledge of HPC, MPI standard, multi-core processors, GPUs/accelerators, and high-performance networking.
Knowledge of InfiniBand, High Speed Ethernet, Omni-Path, or similar high-performance networking technologies.
Familiar with the typical design cycle (design, develop, test, tune, release, bug fixes, etc.) for producing and maintaining high quality software and the associated tools
The ability to work in a team setting
A background in computer science or computer engineering

This is a full-time position, though part-time candidates will be considered. Flexible schedule and remote position. Healthcare, retirement and PTO package provided. Must be eligible to work in the US.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $80,000.00 - $162,636.00 per year
Benefits:

401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance

Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Supplemental Pay:

Bonus pay
Signing bonus

Education:

Bachelor's (Required)

Experience:

Message Passage Interface (MPI): 1 year (Required)
High Performance Computing Technologies & Plaforms: 1 year (Required)
C programming: 2 years (Required)

Work Location: Remote

Sr. Software Engineer
Summary
The primary purpose of this role is to translate business requirements and functional specifications into logical program designs and to deliver code modules, stable application systems, and software solutions. This includes developing, configuring, or modifying complex integrated business and/or enterprise application solutions within various computing environments. This role facilitates the implementation and maintenance of complex business and enterprise software solutions to ensure successful deployment of released applications.Translates complex cross-functional business requirements and functional specifications into logical program designs, code modules, stable application systems, and software solutions; partners with Product Team to understand business needs and functional specificationsCollaborates with cross-functional teams to ensure specifications are converted into flexible, scalable, and maintainable solution designs; evaluates project deliverables to ensure they meet specifications and architectural standardsCoordinates, executes, and participates in component integration (CIT) scenarios, systems integration testing (SIT), and user acceptance testing (UAT) to identify application errors and to ensure quality software deploymentParticipates in all software development end-to-end product lifecycle phases by applying and sharing an in-depth understanding of complex company and industry methodologies, policies, standards, and controlsHas solid grasp of software design patterns and approaches; understands application level software architecture; makes technical trade-off decisions at application levelAutomates and simplifies team development, test, and operations processes; develops detailed architecture plans for large scale enterprise architecture projects and drives the plans to fruitionSolves complex architecture/design and business problems; solutions are extensible; works to simplify, optimize, remove bottlenecks, etc.
Minimum QualificationsBachelor's Degree in Computer Science, CIS, or related field (or equivalent work experience in a related field)5 years of experience in software development or a related field4 years of experience in database technologies4 years of experience working on project(s) involving the implementation of solutions applying development life cycles (SDLC)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: From $95,000.00 per year
Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Experience:

Software development: 5 years (Required)
Database technologies: 4 years (Required)

Work Location: Remote




REMOTE - US 

ENGINEERING 

JR2828 

FULL TIME 


GET YOUR START AT A GROUNDBREAKING COMPANY. 
Our engineering division is composed of many tight-knit and stable teams that each own a specific area of our platform all the way from the UI to the database. You will be assigned directly to one of these teams and will work alongside senior engineers responsible for bringing you up to speed. We will value your ability to work closely with a group of your peers to achieve meaningful results and can offer an excellent platform for starting your career in engineering. 
WHAT YOU’LL DO AS A SOFTWARE ENGINEER, MOBILE: 

You will be working alongside a senior engineer developing new features, iterating on the current systems, and maintaining our high code quality. 
You will work with senior engineers, design and product managers to review UI/UX to make the best product for our users. 
You will collaborate with other engineers on your team to code review, functional test and release iOS and Android builds. 

WHAT YOU’LL BRING: 

Ideally, you have 2 years of experience in mobile development, using one or more of: Xamarin/Xamarin.Forms (C#), Android (Java/Kotlin), iOS (mainly Swift, some Objective C) 
You have a strong knowledge of native operating system capabilities, app signing and deployment processes, and consumer app best practices. 
You have experience writing and maintaining a comprehensive suite of automated unit and integration tests. 
You have a solid understanding of how apps communicate with backend services. 
You have the ability and desire to grow other engineers through code reviews, design reviews, and over-the-shoulder debugging. 

WHO ARE WE A GOOD FIT FOR? 
We love working with talented people but more than that, we seek out compassionate co-workers with a collaborative spirit. Our work moves quickly and we’re great at coming together to find creative solutions to some of tech’s most interesting problems. If that sounds good to you, join us. 
WE ARE DRAFTKINGS. 
We’re inspired by our shared passion for developing creative solutions to complex challenges and empowering the people around us to do their best work. We are industry leaders in the digital entertainment and technology space propelled by constant curiosity and diverse perspectives. 
Our teams are fueled by innovation. We are looking ahead, building what’s next, and continuously reinventing the industry. We’re a publicly traded (NASDAQ: DKNG) technology company headquartered in Boston, with teams around the world and an expanding global presence. 
JOIN US! 
We strive to create a place where all feel safe, empowered, engaged, championed, and inspired. DraftKings is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. This means we do not tolerate discrimination of any kind and are committed to providing equal employment opportunities regardless of your gender identity, race, nationality, religion, sexual orientation, status as a protected veteran, or status as an individual with a disability. 
READY TO BUILD WHAT’S NEXT? APPLY NOW. 
AS A REGULATED GAMING COMPANY, YOU MAY BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A GAMING LICENSE ISSUED BY THE APPROPRIATE STATE AGENCY AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT 
#LI-RW1 

WHO ARE WE A GOOD FIT FOR? 
We love working with talented people but more than that, we seek out compassionate co-workers with a collaborative spirit. Our work moves quickly and we’re great at coming together to find creative solutions to some of tech’s most interesting problems. If that sounds good to you, join us.
 WE ARE DRAFTKINGS.
 We’re inspired by our shared passion for developing creative solutions to complex challenges and empowering the people around us to do their best work. We are industry leaders in the digital entertainment and technology space propelled by constant curiosity and diverse perspectives.  Our teams are fueled by innovation. We are looking ahead, building what’s next, and continuously reinventing the industry. We’re a publicly traded (NASDAQ: DKNG) technology company headquartered in Boston, with teams around the world and an expanding global presence.
 JOIN US!
 We strive to create a place where all feel safe, empowered, engaged, championed, and inspired. DraftKings is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. This means we do not tolerate discrimination of any kind and are committed to providing equal employment opportunities regardless of your gender identity, race, nationality, religion, sexual orientation, status as a protected veteran, or status as an individual with a disability.
 READY TO BUILD WHAT’S NEXT? APPLY NOW.
 As a regulated gaming company, you may be required to obtain a gaming license issued by the appropriate state agency as a condition of employment.



Salary: $120,000 - 170,000/year
We are seeking a Senior Software Engineer (Golang) who will help drive our system’s evolution to join our team. The role will be an integral part of the Video Streaming and Engineering team, working with video engineers to build and release products for various platforms like Desktop, OTT, Mobile. The candidate will be responsible for building, deploying and managing Video Encoding and Delivery applications in cloud (AWS/GCP).
RESPONSIBILITIES: 

Work with other engineers to maintain and evolve our Video encoding and Video delivery platform.
Plan, Design and Build out cloud-based microservices to support video processing workflows.
Field questions and requests regarding APIs and behavior.
Work closely with the QA coordinator to facilitate playback testing across a variety of devices.
Work with other developers and operations team on streamlined CI/CD solutions.
Help in building the shared libraries and architecture to be used across all services.
Work with video engineers in team to modernize and optimize our cloud video Delivery platform
Building new microservices, features and improving Video Delivery, Content Filtering solutions for Paramount+
Responsible for Video Packaging & Delivery.
Work with development teams on re-architecture/modernizing existing systems into the cloud.

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS: 

4+ years of experience as a Software Engineer
Experience with writing microservices in Golang and building shared microservice libraries.
Experience with container technology and management such as Docker.
Experience writing services from scratch in Go Programming language.
Experience working with Cloud/SaaS services such as Amazon AWS or Google Cloud
Strong written, verbal and interpersonal communication skills.

Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $120,000.00 - $170,000.00 per year
Benefits:

401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off

Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Work Location: Remote
Job Location
Remote
Employment type
Regular
Department
Cryptoassets, Technology
Targeted Start Date
Immediate
Cumberland - a DRW Company is the cryptoasset arm of DRW, established in 2014 after pursuing an early interest in cryptoassets and their underlying technologies. Today, Cumberland is a global leader in cryptoassets, uniquely positioned between the traditional financial markets and the cryptoasset ecosystem. From our offices in Chicago, London and Singapore, we provide 24-hour access to a wide array of cryptoassets while helping the crypto ecosystem evolve in a responsible, sustainable way.
We are seeking a Senior JavaScript/TypeScript engineer to join our founding team of a new venture. This is a unique opportunity to contribute to a new blockchain technology unit building a new DeFi protocol. Expect TypeScript, utilizing Node, for back-end microservices, and React powering the front-end.
The position offers opportunity to work on both front-end and back-end code, tight feedback with the CEO, and opportunity to be part of the founding team designing and architecting a new DeFi protocol.
Requirements:
Strong software engineering background
Familiarity with SPA design
Strong experience or interest in JavaScript/TypeScript
Experience or interest in highly secure web UIs
Desirable skills:
Experience with AWS
Experience with writing integration tests
Open-source contributions or side projects
Experience or interest in finance
Experience with Node.js
Experience or interest with WebAssembly
RII develops cutting-edge software for the government and military. We use agile development practices and user-centered design to create innovative software solutions for complex real-world problems. We're breaking through the big, slow status quo with transformative technology that fundamentally changes and improves the world.
We are looking for a committed Quality Engineer to join our QA team. Solve unique, challenging problems for our Defense and Homeland Security customers. Help manage large volumes of critical, real-time information about issues from global to local. Get s#it done.
*This position requires ability to obtain a US security clearance. A current active clearance is not required.*
WHAT YOU WILL BE DOING

Helping to plan the effort to implement and verify the quality of features being developed
Writing test / use case scenarios to be used in planning manual and automated testing
Developing test plans and test cases to be used in automated, feature, regression, acceptance, and smoke testing
Executing manual and automated tests to ensure conformance to requirements and/or customer expectations
Communicating with others on the Engineering team regarding test failures and defects
Creating and reviewing defects / enhancements in an issue tracking system such as Jira

WHAT YOU HAVE DONE

Experience with the software development lifecycle, and in particular with software testing and/or requirements development
Excellent analytical skills, with the ability to decompose problems into testable steps and isolate problems to determine root causes
Experience using test automation tools such as Selenium, BDD, and/or scripting languages such as Java Groovy, Python, or others
Excellent communications skills, in particular written English in a technical business context, and experience conveying information to/from software developers, customers, and other stakeholders with varying technical backgrounds
Strong time-management skills, including delivering work under deadlines or time pressure
Experience working in small teams to deliver results, with a positive attitude, and commitment to success

EVEN BETTER

Experience with the Agile software development methodology or similar methodologies with iterative processes and fluid requirements (e.g. SCRUM, Kanban, XP, etc.)
Experience testing or developing on a modern web application development project
Experience with software development for the military, or other DoD agencies

At RII, we believe that diversity in our workforce is critical to our success. We strive to hire great people from a wide variety of backgrounds, not just because it’s the right thing to do, but because it makes us stronger. We work to help your intellectual passions and creativity thrive. It’s one of our core values: Let your geek flag fly.
We also offer all employees comprehensive benefits including: flexible work schedules, health insurance coverage, paid time off, 401k with a company match, paid parental leave, access to wellness programs and much more. You get this all from day one, and all paid for by RII.
It’s all part of another of our core values: Stay human. It’s why our comfortable and colorful offices such as our headquarters, include a community game room, pantry, massage chair, and an escape room, among other amenities. It’s why we have a community manager and regular community events.
_It’s also why, during the current pandemic, most of us aren’t actually in our lovely office. We’re all working fully remote where possible, with safety controls for those who do have to be on site. RII is committed to not overwhelming our healthcare system, preventing infection for those most at risk, reducing the impact on our communities, and keeping our employees working._
_Research Innovations, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, disability status, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal or local law._
Job Type: Full-time

We are a Series D company that creates software solutions that combine lean principles, predictive and prescriptive analytics, and machine learning to transform hospital and infusion center operations. More than 125 health systems and ~500 hospitals across 42 states rely on our award-winning products to increase patient access, decrease wait times, and reduce healthcare delivery costs. We have raised more than $250 million from top-tier investors such as Insight Partners and Goldman Sachs. We have been named among the top 100 AI companies in the world.
*_Please note that while this role is listed as available for remote, we are currently employing in the following states: AK, AZ, CA, CO, FL, GA, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MO, NH, NC, OH, PA, SC, TX, UT, VA, WA, WI. If your state is not listed, we may not be able to proceed with your application. We have offices in Santa Clara, CA and Charlotte, NC for employees who prefer to work regularly or occasionally from an office._*
Our Quality & Release Engineers are part of small, cross-functional product module teams and work very closely with PM and Dev to ensure quality for their modules with automation and manual testing. Given that we’re an enterprise B2B products company, both manual testing and automation testing are essential.
WHAT YOU’LL DO

Understand the product module you’re assigned to and influence its roadmap from a QA standpoint. You’ll play a key role in ensuring high quality features.
Develop and enhance our core automation frameworks - Functionality, Performance, and Data Quality. We use Protractor/Jasmine for front-end automation and Python for backend/data QA automation.
Work with PM and Dev to plan and release sprints; and develop and execute QA plans and test cases for features, enhancements, and bug fixes. Catch bugs before users do.
Analyze bugs, develop root cause analysis, and help engineers understand the problem.
Work with DevOps to integrate QA frameworks into the Jenkins build pipelines and ensure that all QA automation runs smoothly.

WHAT YOU’LL BRING

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent work experience.
2+ years of professional experience working on production web applications as a QA or software engineer. Formal QA experience is a nice to have, but not a must have. Engineers who want to spend a few years in QA and transition to Dev are welcome (and common to this role).
A broad understanding of database driven web services and applications and visualizing how web applications work. Given a feature, the ability to imagine all the happy paths and unhappy paths and find good bugs.
A robust coding experience with either Javascript or Python or both.
A restlessness for automation.
Familiarity with bug tracking systems; JIRA preferred.
Appreciation for documentation and project management.

WHAT YOU’LL GET

Intellectual and emotional satisfaction of solving tough operational problems in healthcare while improving patient access and saving lives!
Competitive compensation package that includes base salary, annual bonus, and RSUs
401(k) Match
Comprehensive healthcare benefits
Generous Paid Time Off and Parental Leave
Monthly reimbursement for Skill Building
Monthly reimbursement for Wellness, Transportation, and/or Home Office
Education Reimbursement for select courses/programs

#LI-Remote
LeanTaaS is an equal opportunity employer committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value diversity, inclusion, and aim to provide a sense of belonging for everyone. All qualified applicants for employment will be considered without regard to race, color, sex, gender identity, gender expression, religion, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, marital status, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, military or veteran status, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local laws. If you require assistance during the application process, please reach out to accommodations@leantaas.com. LeanTaaS will reasonably accommodate qualified individuals with disabilities to the extent required by applicable law.
Please note: LeanTaaS is not accepting agency resumes at this time, and we are not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Thank you.
Job Type: Full-time


Piper Companies is seeking a Software Architect for a world leading technology organization. The Software Architect will be responsible for the overall architecture of a go to market software and cloud based solution. An ideal candidate for the Software Architect will have earlier career experience as a software developer working into a software architecture role.

 Responsibilities for the Software Architect include: 

 Provide overall technical leadership and architectural guidance to multiple Agile teams
 Design and implement scalable architectural software and cloud based solutions 
 Write and provide clear documentation of the architecture 
 Research new technologies and make technology decisions

 
Requirements for the Software Architect include: 

 Proven software architecture experience architecting cloud native enterprise scalable solutions
 Previous professional java development experience and understanding of OO best practices
 Strong understanding of microservices architecture and data security best practices
 Experience with Azure or AWS 
 Strong verbal and written communication skills 
 Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science and/or Computer Engineering preferred or relevant work experience

 
Compensation of the Software Architect: $170,000 - $225,000 plus a comprehensive benefits package

 
 

 No relocation assistance, sponsorship, or C2C arrangements available

 
Keywords: Software Architect, Sr. Software Developer, Sr. Software Engineer, Sr. Java Developer, Sr. Java Engineer, Sr. Full Stack Developer, Java, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, REACT, Angular, REST, Microservices, Spring Boot, Spring Batch, Arlington, Virginia, Washington DC



Please apply here: https://app.dover.io/apply/benchling/972cbf6b-650d-420d-841a-e8c19bc76fa2?rs=55634680
Over the coming years, biotech will fundamentally rewrite the way we live. Gene editing and cell therapy are dramatically changing how we treat cancer and other major illnesses. Biofuels and biomaterials are transforming the cars we drive, the clothes we wear, and the makeup of everyday objects. Crop science and synthetic biology are producing sustainable and ethical food. Benchling’s mission is to accelerate the research that propels us towards this reality, and magnify its impact, through modern software.
Every day, scientists around the world use Benchling’s applications, platform, & analytics in their efforts to solve humanity’s most pressing problems. For these scientists, Benchling is the central technology they use to conduct their research. Our customers include pharmaceutical giants, leading biotechs, and the world’s most renowned research institutes.
ROLE OVERVIEW
Benchling brings best-in-breed data infrastructure to the world’s leading biotech companies. As an Infrastructure Engineer, you’ll build the processes and underlying systems that power Benchling’s platform and applications. Ultimately, your work will be reflected in the agility, performance, reliability, and security of the Benchling platform.
Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) at Benchling is also part of the Infrastructure team. We empower engineers on other teams by making their work easier. As the Benchling engineering team triples in size, we’ll invest in our service architecture, monitoring. tooling, and site reliability processes so we can build the next generation of our product. Our users are generating more kinds of data at an increasing rate and they’re collaborating globally with each other, so our infrastructure needs to grow alongside them. In addition, the data our customers entrust us with is key to their businesses, so our platform needs to be highly reliable and trusted.
As a platform, Benchling is also a developer-facing product where we enable new forms of automation and integration in the life science space. Your work will be used more directly here - Benchling infrastructure extends or replaces our customers’ infrastructure to store/process data. You may build systems that form a data pipeline for experimental results, an event queue to trigger customer integrations, or a compute platform to deploy and scale custom analysis.
We are looking for strong engineers with 5+ years of experience to join as a member of the larger Platform team and work alongside other infrastructure-focused peers. You’ll collaborate with former Stripe, Google, and Facebook engineers to build a highly reliable, yet rapidly-evolving, backbone of our platform.
If you are to graduate with your Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in class of 2021-2022, please consider applying to our Software Engineer, New Graduate position here.
WHAT YOU MIGHT WORK ON

Design, build, and maintain core infrastructure hosted on AWS
Build developer-facing systems to test, build, and deploy Benchling’s software
Define and implement our infrastructural security posture
Develop monitoring/observability and automation as part of a lean operations function
Define and lead processes for site reliability that will be used across Engineering and Customer Experience
These are examples of projects we’ve worked on in the past or may work on in the near future - our projects are often changing, but this will hopefully give you an idea of the work to be done.
Iterating on our tenancy model and architecture to build out resource isolation, data segmentation, and deployment models as we scale our customer base.
Building a test and deploy pipeline on Buildkite - we have a large test suite and a large number of Benchling instances and need tools to deploy faster while maintaining the same degree of reliability.
Improving network performance for global users - this is an open-ended problem which needs to be solved as our user base becomes increasingly international.
Observability - mature our monitoring, tracing, and alerting systems so we have the right dashboards, notifications, and tools to quickly identify and resolve operational issues.
Automating remediation of fault conditions to improve overall reliability and eliminate repetitive operational tasks.
Building tooling and infrastructure for a more modular/service-based architecture - we’re not religious about microservices or monoliths, but we plan to scale our architecture with our engineering team.

ABOUT YOU

5+ more years of experience as a DevOps engineer, Site Reliability engineer, or Software Engineer building platform infrastructure.
Have experience with deployment and configuration management frameworks such as Terraform, Ansible, or Chef; with CI/CD systems such as BuildKite or Jenkins; and with containers and container management systems such as Kubernetes or Amazon ECS.
Understand cloud computing, virtualization, and microservices architectures. Experience with major cloud platforms, especially AWS, is a plus.
Write clear, well-tested code in Python, Java, Go, or Ruby.
Have a bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related field.

LEADERSHIP PRINCIPLES

Admit mistakes and shortcomings
Deliver results
Disagree and commit
Obsess over customers
Rely on work ethic
Show empathy
Recruit and develop the best
Sweat the details
Think and communicate clearly
Unite around the mission

PERKS AND BENEFITS

Work with a talented yet humble team
Competitive compensation & equity package
Weekly virtual social events, and annual company retreats
401k, Medical, dental, and vision insurance (US Employees Only)
Monthly health & wellness stipend
Yearly educational stipend
Flexible & Generous Vacation Policy: If you feel you need a break, you can talk directly with your manager to find coverage and support while you are out of the office. Need time off to vote? We’ve got you covered.
Quarterly company-wide mental health days off
Holiday Shut-down: company-wide holiday shut-down between Christmas Eve and New Years
Major US and EMEA holidays observed
To support remote work conditions during the COVID-19 pandemic, Benchling provides each employee a one-time stipend of $1,000(USD) upon commencing employment, and additional discounted employee purchase plans for home-office equipment.

In following best practices and safety protocols, all Benchling employees are expected to work remotely until we are further advised that it is safe for employees to resume work in their respective office locations.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We also consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law, including but not limited to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $150,000.00 - $220,000.00 per year
Benefits:

Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance

Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Application Question(s):

Please apply here:

https://app.dover.io/apply/benchling/972cbf6b-650d-420d-841a-e8c19bc76fa2?rs=55634680
Work Location: Remote
Software Engineer, UI

Ripple is the world's only enterprise blockchain solution for global payments. Today the world sends more than $155 trillion across borders. Yet, the underlying infrastructure is dated and flawed. Ripple connects banks, payment providers, corporates and digital asset exchanges via RippleNet to provide one frictionless experience to send money globally.

Ripple is growing rapidly and we are looking for a results oriented and a passionate UI Software Engineer to help build the next generation of payment applications that enable banks, payment providers, corporates etc to instantly settle cross-border payments to create the Internet of Value. Ripple's distributed financial technology outperforms today's banking infrastructure by driving down costs, increasing processing speeds and delivering end-to-end visibility into payment fees, timing and delivery.

What you'll do:

Build client-facing web applications integrating with blockchain technologies and all forms of currencies (traditional as well as crypto)
Participate in the full software development lifecycle
Work with teams across the organization, including product, design, integrations, ops, customer success etc.

What we're looking for:

At least 1 year of web development experience with technologies such as modern Javascript frameworks (React), HTML5, CSS/SASS, Webpack, NPM. Experience with any other similar front end technologies should be fine.
Experience with Agile development and shipping customer facing features on a regular cadence
Mobile web development experience/familiarity is a plus
BS in Computer Science or similar


WHAT WE OFFER:

The chance to work in a fast-paced start-up environment with experienced industry leaders
A learning environment where you can dive deep into the latest technologies and make an impact
Competitive salary and equity
100% paid medical and dental and 95% paid vision insurance for employees starting on your first day
401k (with match), commuter benefits
Industry-leading parental leave policies
Generous wellness reimbursement and weekly onsite programs
Flexible vacation policy - work with your manager to take time off when you need it
Employee giving match
Modern office in San Francisco's Financial District
Fully-stocked kitchen with organic snacks, beverages, and coffee drinks
Weekly company meeting - ask me anything style discussion with our Leadership Team
Team outings to sports games, happy hours, game nights and more!

WHO WE ARE:

Ripple is doing for value what the internet did for information: enabling its instant and seamless flow around the world. We call this the Internet of Value (IoV). Using blockchain and cryptocurrency technology, Ripple is dedicated to creating powerful gains in financial efficiency, equity and inclusion. In addition, Ripple is developing and enabling the future use cases that will catalyze the new digital economy for governments, businesses and consumers.

Ripple has offices in San Francisco (HQ), New York, London, Mumbai, Singapore, São Paulo, Reykjavík, Washington D.C. and Dubai.

Ripple is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We're committed to building a diverse and inclusive team. We do not discriminate against qualified employees or applicants because of race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual preference, sexual identity, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, marital status, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, military status, or any other characteristic protected by local law or ordinance.

Please find our UK/EU Applicant Privacy Notice and our California Applicant Privacy Notice for reference.
MiTek is a platform innovator and enabler that exists to transform the building industry with better building solutions. In 1955, MiTek transformed residential construction with the invention of the Gang-Nail plate and a digital platform that provided an affordable and scalable way to manufacture wood trusses. Today, MiTek delivers software, services, engineered products, and automated solutions that enable the building industry to improve efficiencies by optimizing the balance between off-site and on-site. With nearly 5,600 team members worldwide, MiTek collaborates across the building industry to enable and accelerate transformational breakthroughs in design and construction to transform the way the industry designs, makes, and builds. As a Berkshire Hathaway (NYSE: BRK-A, NYSE: BRK-B) company since 2001, MiTek has a record of continuous growth and innovation. Learn more at www.mii.com.
Summary: We are seeking a dynamic and motivated Software Engineering Manager responsible for managing the design and development of enterprise desktop and web applications targeted to residential construction business management. Accountable for leading the coding and debugging of both desktop and web-based applications by performing the following duties.
Responsibilities: 
Other duties may be assigned, but they include the following:

Cultivate a strong development team through hiring, training, and the creation of growth opportunities.
Manage and lead design, implementation, testing, and debugging of new and existing software on a Microsoft stack.
Complete projects on time and within budget.
Manage resourcing, estimation, scheduling, and execution of tasks, feature sets, and sprint plans.
Disseminate progress, blocking issues, and changes to appropriate audience in a timely fashion.
Provide vision, goals, and motivation to team and others.
Provide technical guidance, assistance, and contributions to the team.
Explore and relay opportunities for innovation and improvement.
Manage the refactoring of existing software to ensure long term viability.
Evaluate and recommend technologies, hardware, software, and services.
Interact with customers to help quickly solve or mitigate issues.

Required Qualifications: 

Bachelor of Science degree in technical field or equivalent experience.
Strong software development and software engineering background.
10+ years of software design and development experience.
Working knowledge of Agile software development using Scrum or Kanban.
Experience with C# and .NET Framework required
Experience with SQL required
Experience with Azure required

Preferred Qualifications: 

Experience with WPF
Experience with Angular or an equivalent framework
Understanding of a microservice architecture
Knowledge of ASP.NET, RESTful APIs, and SOA

In compliance with the Colorado Equal Pay For Equal Work Act, the pay range for this position is estimated at $110k-$140k/year. Base pay offered may vary based on job-related knowledge, skills and experience. Please visit www.mii.com/about/careers/ to learn more about MiTek’s benefit opportunities.
MiTek is an E-Verify and Drug and Tobacco-Free Workplace. 
We are an equal opportunity employer; and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ethnicity, physical or mental disability, sex (including pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or transgender status), age (40 and over), genetic information (including family medical history), veteran status, or any other protected characteristic.
For accommodation to assist with completing this application, please contact Human Resources at +1 314-434-1200.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:

401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance

Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Supplemental Pay:

Bonus pay

Application Question(s):

This position is fully remote within the United States only. Are you currently living in the United States?

Experience:

C# and/or .NET Framework: 1 year (Preferred)
Azure: 1 year (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote

This role involves development of embedded application for inertial navigational functionality for space & satellite usage.
This effort includes SW development of data integrity, navigational solutions, and communication aspects on a space based electronic system. Requires working knowledge of C / C/C++, JIRA, and Bitbucket.
Possesses the ability to write test scripts to test SW features and to run regression tests. Knowledgeable in building the SW release.
Requires a bachelor's degree in area of specialty and at least 5+ years of experience in the field or in a related area.
May provide consultation on complex projects and is considered a top-level contributor / specialist.
Must have the following experience: Software Development Life Cycle process development; requirements, design,implementation, unit and integration testing phases. Utilizing and developing embedded software for Real-Time Operating Systems (RTOS) and rate-based systems.
Utilizing C/C++ software development environments to build and debug software on target hardware
Maintaining software under version control using GIT / BitBucket or similar Software version control systems Utilizing Atlassian Jira (or similar) for issue tracking Familiar with static code analysis tools.We value subcontractors with the following experience: Navigational and sensor elements in a Space development environment Development and utilization of aerospace I/O standards (ARINC, MIL-STS 1553, Fiber Optic, Ethernet)
Job Type: Contract
Salary: $80.00 - $90.00 per hour
Schedule:

8 hour shift

Application Question(s):

Your E-mail address?

Education:

Bachelor's (Preferred)

Experience:

Embedded software development: 5 years (Required)
RTOS: 4 years (Required)
Navigation/Space: 2 years (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote
Welcome to Allscripts! Our Mission is to be the most trusted provider of innovative solutions that empower all stakeholders across the healthcare continuum to deliver world-class outcomes. Our Vision is a Connected Community of Health that spans continents and borders. With the largest community of clients in healthcare, Allscripts is able to deliver an integrated platform of clinical, financial, connectivity and information solutions to facilitate enhanced collaboration and exchange of critical patient information.
FollowMyHealth is helping millions of patients take charge of their health by connecting to their doctor in a whole new way. By offering the most comprehensive and integrated enterprise and mobile patient engagement platform on the market, innovative providers are significantly improving the patient experience and driving digital transformation at their organizations. We believe taking care of your health works best when you are in an open, connected community with your doctor, and FollowMyHealth makes it easy to do just that in a secure, mobile-friendly application.

Why work for us? This isn't your typical corporate job. With the culture of a startup and the security of a publicly traded company, every person plays an integral role in mission-critical work. When you work for us, we'll help you grow your skills and knowledge while working with the most talented people of your career.

The primary purpose of this role is to Perform Coding, Testing, Documentation in the areas of Development and Maintenance.

Responsibilities:

Coding, Testing, Documentation in the areas of Development and Maintenance
Ownership of assigned software and non-software deliverables
Liaison with Business Analysts and/or internal customers to ensure that requirements are understood
Production, preparation and execution of unit test plans
Production of efficient and fully documented code
Production of supporting technical and installation documentation for internal and external publication
Achievement of agreed productivity targets in order to ensure developments are delivered within budget, to schedule and to defined quality standards
Completion of all necessary software and non-software components in the timescales as defined by the Project Manager. Quality and adherence to Standards
Tech Specs, Code and/or Unit Test Plans produced are all in line with the Traceability Matrix/Functional Specification
Timely and accurate reporting of project status as required by Line or Project Manager
Escalate all issues in a timely fashion


Qualifications:

Academic and professional qualifications:

Bachelors degree in a relevant program of study


Experience:

2-5 years' experience in development
Experience with object oriented design and development
Knowledge of the software development lifecycle
Skills using .NET Framework 4.0 or higher
Experience with C# is desired
Experience with HTML and JavaScript is plus
Experience with major DBMS tools – SQL Server desired
Ability to adapt quickly to changing needs & requirements
Experience with MS Azure is a huge bonus!

Core Skills:

C# .Net
.Net Core
HTML
Javascript/Typescript
CSS
Web application development
Version control systems (GIT)
Distributed system development
Microservice architecture

Bonus Skills:

Angular
Angular.js
Knockout.js
Enterprise level application development
Cloud application development (Microsoft Azure preferred)

Travel Requirements:

Very little to no travel is required in this role

Working Arrangements:

Monday through Friday or as defined by local requirements

Must have received or be willing to receive the COVID-19 vaccine by date of hire to be considered for employment with Allscripts.

Visa Sponsorship is not offered for this position.

At Allscripts, our greatest strength comes from bringing together talented people with diverse perspectives to support the technology needs of 180,000 physicians, 1,500 hospitals and 10,000 postacute organizations across the globe. Allscripts offers a comprehensive compensation and benefits package, including holidays, vacation, medical, dental, and vision insurance, company paid life insurance and retirement savings.

Allscripts' policy is to provide equal employment opportunity and affirmative action in all of its employment practices without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, marital status, protected veteran status, age, individuals with disabilities, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression or any other legally protected category. Applicants for North American based positions with Allscripts must be legally authorized to work in the United States or Canada. Verification of employment eligibility will be required as a condition of hire. Allscripts is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace dedicated to pursing and hiring a diverse and inclusive workforce.

From a "VEVRAA Federal Contractor" We request Priority Referral of Protected Veterans

This is an official Allscripts Job posting. To avoid identity theft, please only consider applying to jobs posted on our official corporate site.

Thank you for reviewing this Allscripts opportunity! Does this look like a great match for your skill set? If so, scroll on down and tell us more about yourself!Who We are

BairesDev is proud to be the fastest-growing company in America. With people in five continents and world-class clients, we are only as strong as the multicultural teams at the heart of our business. To consistently deliver the highest quality solutions to our clients, we only hire the Top 1% of the best talents and nurture their professional growth on exciting projects.
Email Marketing Specialist at BairesDev
We are looking for Email Marketing Specialists to join our company. As part of this team, you will coordinate and execute the development and publishing of email campaigns, executing all email promotion set-up and trouble-shooting and potential issues.
This is an excellent opportunity for those professionals looking to develop in one of the fastest-growing companies in the industry!
What You’ll Do:
Build email lists, create emails, and foster leads through written communications.Work with email automation software, sending mass emails.Focus on executing segmentation, delivering specific messages to select audiences based on behavior.Monitoring and analysis of the campaign's results.Secure email databases for future campaigns.
Here’s what we are looking for:
2+ years of software development experience demonstrating basic programming skills, application analysis, and testing.Proficiency in implementing email programs within ESP tool limitations.Experience with Bootstrap, Foundation, or similar systems.Experience working w/ build tools.Familiar with responsive web development for multi-touch devices.Working experience with Photoshop, Illustrator, Sketch.Advance English Level.
How we do make your work (and your life) easier:
100% remote work.Hardware setup for you to work from home.
- Flexible hours - make your schedule.
Paid parental leave, vacation & holidays.Diverse and multicultural work environment.An innovative environment with the structure and resources of a leading multinational.Excellent compensation — well above the market average.Here you can grow at the speed of your learning curve.
Our people work remotely but with a consistent and robust culture that promotes diversity and teamwork. To continue being the leading software development company in Latin America, we want to ensure that every BairesDev member gets the best growth and professional development opportunities in a diverse, welcoming, and innovative environment.

Every BairesDev team member brings something unique to our company.
We want to hear your story. Apply now!
Overview 
Job duties include, but not limited to, Unity App development (iOS, Android, webGL), C# programming, 3D Model manipulation.
Work schedule can be 5 eight-hour days or 4 nine-hour days and 1 four-hour day. Please also note there will be 50 unbillable hours for training purposes.
Education and Experience 

Bachelor's degree or Technical Degree and relevant experience required.
2 year degree will be considered with correct skill set.
0-2 years experience in game app development required.
2-4 years of experience working with Unity preferred.

Skills Required 

A strong understanding of App creation for Android and iOS, C# Programming or equivalent programming languages, Unity Animation Editor required.
Experience with database and server integration into Apps required.
Knowledge of Lighting and material shader scripting required.
Strong mechanical aptitude and attention to detail.
Critical thinking and strong reasoning skills.
Strong collaboration and communication skills

Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $48,300.00 - $50,300.00 per year
Benefits:

Health insurance
Paid time off

Schedule:

Monday to Friday

Education:

Associate (Preferred)

Experience:

Unity: 1 year (Required)

Work Location: Remote



ABOUT US:
 Braintrust is the only network that gives in-demand talent all the freedom of freelance with all the benefits, community and stability of a full-time role. As the first decentralized talent network, our revolutionary Web3 model ensures the community that relies on Braintrust to find work are the same people who own and build it through the blockchain token, BTRST. So unlike other marketplaces that take 20% to 50% of talent earnings, Braintrust allows talent to keep 100% of earnings and to vote on key changes to improve the network. Braintrust is working to change the way freelance works – for good.


 JOB TYPE: Freelance, Contract Position (no agencies/C2C - see notes below)
LOCATION: Remote United States only (TimeZoneEST | Full day overlap)
HOURLY RANGE: Our client is looking to pay $90-$120h
ESTIMATED DURATION: 40h/week - long-term, ongoing project

THE OPPORTUNITY
 United States only
 As a Python Software Engineer, you will be responsible for the development, implementation and maintenance of features and applications of the Technology Platform across all brands globally.


 Responsibilities:
 Software Development Development of software features  Implement solutions following best practices  Maintenance of technical products


 Design Technical Solutions  Design of technical solutions  Documentation of technical solutions


 Product Architecture Evolution  Design product architecture improvements  Implement product architecture evolutions


 Maintain Continuous Integration Pipeline  Implement and maintain test automation  Maintain continuous integration and delivery pipelines


 Required Skills:  2-5 years of professional experience  Backend programing language required knowledge: Python is required, and C/C++ desired  Frontend programing language knowledge: ReactJS, CSS and HTML5  Knowledge of development concepts: Multithreading programing, Asynchronous processing, TCP and Serial communications, Queues and Topics, REST APIs, Clean Code and Clean Architecture 
 Knowledge of modern databases, especially SQLite and Postgres, NoSQL database
 knowledge is desired  Knowledge of modern technical architecture (hosted/cloud and distributed/on prem)  Experience in Agile software development methodology, especially Scrum  Experience with CI/CD pipelines (unit tests, deployment tools etc)  Excellent communication, interpersonal, and written skills  Strong analytical and risk mitigation skills


 Preferred Skills:  Bachelor's in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related degree  Experience in mission critical software development  Knowledge of retail and restaurant business, specially QSR is desired


 Apply Now!


 ABOUT THE HIRING PROCESS:
 Qualified candidates will be invited to do a screening interview with the Braintrust staff. We will answer your questions about the project, and our platform. If we determine it is the right fit for both parties, we'll invite you to join the platform and create a profile to apply directly for this project.
 C2C Candidates: This role is not available to C2C candidates working with an agency. If you are a professional contractor who has created an LLC/corp around their consulting practice, this is well aligned with Braintrust and we'd welcome your application.
 Braintrust values the multitude of talents and perspectives that a diverse workforce brings. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, religion, age, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or protected veteran status.



(THIS POSITION IS FOR USC ON C2C ONLY!!)
Role: AWS Cloud Engineer
Location: 100% remote role
Duration: Long Term
Job Description: 

Bachelor's Degree or industry experience
5-7 Years of experience
Demonstrated ability designing and deploying cloud solutions in AWS
Proven experience delivering infrastructure as code (i.e. Terraform, CloudFormation)
Deep technical knowledge supporting Linux and Windows operating systems
Ability and desire to solve new problems with minimal guidance
US Citizenship (can be remote US position)
The ability to pass a state or Federal background check
Amazon Web Services Associate or Professional level certification
Experience operating containerized applications on Kubernetes
Experience with a programming or scripting language (i.e. Python, Bash, Powershell)
Familiarity with compliance frameworks (i.e. FedRAMP, NIST, PCI, CJIS)
Hands-on experience in Incident and problem management
Installs and maintains cloud-based applications, systems, or associated infrastructures.
Analyzes and defines business requirements to determine specifications and standards; proposes and develops solutions.
Deploys and oversees implementation and integration of web-based applications, ensuring that appropriate information security standards are met.
Maintains reports, logs, or other records of security audits.
Monitors system uptime and performance, troubleshooting and resolving errors.
Stays informed of emerging cloud technologies and evaluates their value to the organization's operations.
Typically requires experience with one or more cloud computing platforms.
Performs work under direct supervision. Handles basic issues and problems, and refers more complex issues to higher-level staff. Possesses beginning to working knowledge of subject matter

Job Type: Contract
Pay: $65.00 - $70.00 per hour
Schedule:

8 hour shift

Experience:

Terraform: 5 years (Preferred)
AWS: 5 years (Preferred)
Kubernetes: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
PowerShell: 5 years (Preferred)
FedRAMP: 5 years (Preferred)
Linux: 5 years (Preferred)
Bash: 5 years (Preferred)
NIST standards: 5 years (Preferred)
PCI: 5 years (Preferred)

Security clearance:

Confidential (Preferred)

Work Location: Remote
See yourself at Twilio

Join the team as our next ML Engineer

Who we are & why we're hiring

Twilio powers real-time business communications and data solutions that help companies and developers worldwide build better applications and customer experiences.

Although we're headquartered in San Francisco, we have presence throughout South America, Europe, Asia and Australia. We're on a journey to becoming a globally anti-racist, anti-oppressive, anti-bias company that actively opposes racism and all forms of oppression and bias. At Twilio, we support diversity, equity & inclusion wherever we do business. We employ thousands of Twilions worldwide, and we're looking for more builders, creators, and visionaries to help fuel our growth momentum.

About the job

This position is needed to scope, design, and deploy machine learning systems into the real world to ensure that communication across Twilio platforms remains legal, safe and wanted.

As a Machine-Learning Engineer, you thrive at designing large-scale systems, building complex predictive models, performing efficient experimentation and automating processes. You will partner with Architects, Product Managers and Operational Leaders for developing anti-fraud/ anti-abuse systems for our customers.

Responsibilities

In this role, you'll:

Build algorithms based on statistical modelling procedures and build and maintain scalable machine learning solutions in production
Transform data science prototypes and applying appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Work closely with the Data Scientists, build tools to enhance their productivity and to ship and maintain ML models
Analyze huge datasets to perform EDA and come out with patterns and features to support the problem statement.
Manage the infrastructure and data pipelines needed to bring code to production
Demonstrate end-to-end understanding of applications (including, but not limited to, the machine learning algorithms) being created
Partner with product managers and architects to analyse business problems, clarify requirements and define the scope of the systems needed
Use cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP to handle larger scale data
Support operational leaders by developing code to automate manual processes
Drive high engineering standards on the team through code review, automated testing, and mentoring.
Develop white papers, blogs, reference implementations, labs, and presentations to evangelize Twilio's design patterns and best practices for Anti-Fraud/ Anti-Abuse solutions
Qualifications

Not all applicants will have skills that match a job description exactly. Twilio values diverse experiences in other industries, and we encourage everyone who meets the required qualifications to apply. While having "desired" qualifications make for a strong candidate, we encourage applicants with alternative experiences to also apply. If your career is just starting or hasn't followed a traditional path, don't let that stop you from considering Twilio. We are always looking for people who will bring something new to the table!

Required:

Ph.D./MS/Bachelor's in Computer Science, statistics, or related field
2+ years of applied ML experience in statistical and mathematical modeling such as supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deep learning, and/or reinforcement learning; 3+ years and a Master's degree
Track record of building, shipping and maintaining machine learning systems in a highly ambiguous and fast paced environment.
Exposure to different ML frameworks and exposure to services like Sagemaker, Clarify, Model Monitoring, TensorFlow, MxNet, PyTorch, Sklearn, etc. preferred
Have hands-on experience with container orchestration frameworks (e.g. Kubernetes, EKS, ECS)
Familiarity with concepts related to testing and maintaining models in production such as A/B testing, retraining, monitoring model performance
Hands on experience with modern data storage, messaging, and processing tools (Kafka, Flink, Spark, Hadoop, Cassandra, etc.) and demonstrated experience designing and coding in big-data components such as DynamoDB or similar
Proficiency in Python is preferred. We will also consider strong quantitative candidates with a background in other programming languages such as Scala/Java

Desired:

Experience developing products on AWS or Google Cloud Services.
Experience in configuration management for deploying, configuring, and managing servers and systems.

Location

This role will be remote, and based in the USA. No travel is required.

What We Offer

There are many benefits to working at Twilio, including, in addition to competitive pay, things like generous time-off, ample parental and wellness leave, healthcare, a retirement savings program, and much more. Offerings vary by location.

Twilio thinks big. Do you?

We like to solve problems, take initiative, pitch in when needed, and are always up for trying new things. That's why we seek out colleagues who embody our values — something we call Twilio Magic. Additionally, we empower employees to build positive change in their communities by supporting their volunteering and donation efforts.

So, if you're ready to unleash your full potential, do your best work, and be the best version of yourself, apply now!

If this role isn't what you're looking for, please consider other open positions.

(Location dependent information)
Please note this role is open to candidates outside of Colorado as well. The information below is provided for those hired in Colorado only.
If you are a Colorado applicant:

The estimated pay range for this role, based in Colorado, is $109,280.00 - $150,260.
Non-Sales: Additionally, this role is eligible to participate in Twilio's equity plan.

The successful candidate's starting salary will be determined based on permissible, non-discriminatory factors such as skills, experience, and geographic location within the state. This role is also eligible to participate in Twilio's equity plan and for the following benefits: health care insurance, 401(k) retirement account, paid sick time, paid personal time off, paid parental leave.

Job Description


Remote: Position does not require employee to be on-site full-time to perform most effectively. The employee's role enables them to work off-site on a permanent basis.
  
 The Software Defined Vehicle (SDV) team supports the definition, design, and development of continuously improving mobility services. SDV is a new vehicle intelligence platform that will underpin all our future innovations across a wide range of technological advancements, including EVs and expanded automated driving. This means that you can potentially put a fingerprint on the vehicles that drive down the road! This space is ripe with technical leadership opportunities for advanced technology development, as well as the ability to provide mentorship for new employees. You can flex your teamwork muscles as you will be tasked with working with several other areas of engineering, IT, and the business.
  
 This 
  SDV Software Modeling Engineer position involves hands on modeling work in either RSMT or Vector DaVinci (AUTOSAR). You will serve as the primary interface with the users, architects, and integration teams to perform root cause analysis as applicable. This requires cross-functional coordination with team members and in some cases, Vector to resolve issues. In the software space, you'll experience an agile, fast-paced work environment, surrounded by great mentors and teams.
  
 This is a great role for someone that thrives in a challenging environment and is looking for a position with both leadership and technical responsibilities!
  
 Responsibilities Include:
  

 Work cross functionally to implement model changes in either RSMT or Vector DaVinci per software cadence on time and with quality 
 Work with software architects, system architects, software engineers, and other embedded system engineers to define sprint goals 
 Understand modeling and software build tools (RSMT, MDK, Git Ecosystem, Gerrit, Jenkins Pipeline) 
 Model and document software interfaces in a modeling and document toolchain 
 Manage change requests in the system and with the architecture community to implement your changes into actions 
 Understand the mapping of signals to software interfaces 
 Lead code reviews with the best software talent in the industry 
 Communicate information to and from internal and external customer organizations


 Additional Job Description


Required Qualifications: 


Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related technical degree 
 Minimum of 2 years of embedded software engineering experience 
 High level of analytical ability where problems are unusual and difficult 
 Strong interpersonal skills to work independently and optimally with others 
 Good business sense and a desire to understand customer needs 
 A track record of "getting things done" by managing and leading multiple projects and assignments with a high level of autonomy and accountability for results 
 Strong oral and written communication skills  
Lead multiple priorities while maintaining a commitment to the tasks at hand 
 Able to identify problems, analyze varying courses of action to determine, recommend and negotiate optimal solutions and execute contingency plans 
 Ability to work in a disciplined software development environment


 Preferred Qualifications: 


Master's degree in a related field 
 5 years of experience in a software-related area and/or software development 
 Knowledge of Adaptive AUTOSAR and QNX 
 Knowledge in Vector DaVinci 
 Design/Development of Safety Critical Systems/Components 
 Experience with Service Oriented Architecture (SOA), Software as a Service (SaaS), Microservices, etc. 
 Knowledge in Git Ecosystem (GES), Rational Team Concert (RTC), and RSMT (Interface management)

 FOR GM INTERNAL CANDIDATES: This role is posted at both the 7th and 6th level. The determination by HR and the Hiring Manager as to whether an offer will be lateral or promotional will be based on a candidate's relevant experience and whether the role will amount to a significant increase in level of responsibility.
  
 Compensation: This position may be filled with a mid-level ($91,332) OR a Sr. level candidate ($126,756).
  
 Bonus Potential: An incentive pay program offers payouts based on company performance, job level, and individual performance.
  
 Benefits: GM offers a variety of health and wellbeing benefit programs. Benefit options include medical, dental, vision, Health Savings Account, Flexible Spending Accounts, retirement savings plan, sickness and accident benefits, life insurance, paid vacation & holidays, tuition assistance programs, employee assistance program, GM vehicle discounts and more.
  
 #LI-Remote
  

About GM

 Our vision is a world with Zero Crashes, Zero Emissions and Zero Congestion and we embrace the responsibility to lead the change that will make our world better, safer and more equitable for all.
  

Why Join Us

 We aspire to be the most inclusive company in the world. We believe we all must make a choice every day - individually and collectively - to drive meaningful change through our words, our deeds and our culture. Our Work Appropriately philosophy supports our foundation of inclusion and provides employees the flexibility to work where they can have the greatest impact on achieving our goals, dependent on role needs. Every day, we want every employee, no matter their background, ethnicity, preferences, or location, to feel they belong to one General Motors team.
  

Benefits Overview

 The goal of the General Motors total rewards program is to support the health and well-being of you and your family. Our comprehensive compensation plan incudes, the following benefits, in addition to many others:
  

Paid time off including vacation days, holidays, and parental leave for mothers, fathers and adoptive parents;
Healthcare (including a triple tax advantaged health savings account and wellness incentive), dental, vision and life insurance plans to cover you and your family;
Company and matching contributions to 401K savings plan to help you save for retirement;
Global recognition program for peers and leaders to recognize and be recognized for results and behaviors that reflect our company values; 
Tuition assistance and student loan refinancing;
Discount on GM vehicles for you, your family and friends.


 Diversity Information

 General Motors is committed to being a workplace that is not only free of discrimination, but one that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging. We strongly believe that workforce diversity creates an environment in which our employees can thrive and develop better products for our customers. We understand and embrace the variety through which people gain experiences whether through professional, personal, educational, or volunteer opportunities.GM is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
  
 We encourage interested candidates to review the key responsibilities and qualifications and apply for any positions that match your skills and capabilities.
  

Equal Employment Opportunity Statements

 The policy of General Motors is to extend opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression or veteran status. Additionally, General Motors is committed to being an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Employer and offers opportunities to all job seekers including individuals with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, email us atCareers.Accommodations@GM.com. In your email, please include a description of the specific accommodation you are requesting as well as the job title and requisition number of the position for which you are applying.
 
